Washington statutes.
RCW 4.72.060

Grounds for vacation may first be tried.

The court may first try and decide upon the grounds to vacate or modify a judgment or order, before trying or deciding upon the validity of the defense or cause of action.

[Code 1881 s 442; 1877 p 97 s 440; 1875 p 22 s 7; RRS s 470.]